Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1219
Complaints and hearings; procedures.

A person with developmental disabilities or his or her parent or guardian may initiate a hearing on matters related to the initiation, change, or termination of or the refusal to initiate, change, or terminate the determination of eligibility for specialized services or the evaluation or placement of the person or the provision of specialized services or records relating thereto. A copy of the procedures specified in rules and regulations of the department for complaints and hearings under this section shall be provided to such persons who are receiving specialized services or their parents or guardians. The hearing shall be initiated by filing a petition with the department.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 19;

Laws 2004, LB 297, § 5.